Colorado, session 2026A, HB1262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Colorado
Patient Access and Compounding Clarity Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Sterile and nonsterile compounded medical items are used and
relied upon on a daily basis in hospitals, surgical centers, behavioral health
treatment facilities, and other care settings across Colorado;
(b) Federal standards for sterile and nonsterile compounding have
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

evolved in recent years, and state law should reflect that framework to
ensure clarity and continuity;
(c) Modernizing Colorado's laws regarding compounding promotes
patient safety, reduces unnecessary regulatory duplication, and supports
uninterrupted access to essential medications;
(d) Preserving the availability of high-quality compounded medical
items is vital for Colorado patients and the providers that serve them; and
(e) Federal law recognizes 2 lawful pathways for the compounding
of human drug products under sections 503a and 503b of the "Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act". These provisions establish the framework under
which licensed pharmacies and outsourcing facilities may prepare
compounded medications in accordance with federal standards to meet
patient needs.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-120, add (1.5)
as follows:
12-280-120. Compounding - dispensing - sale of drugs and
devices - rules - definition.
(1.5) (a) IF THE ACTION IS UNDERTAKEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH
APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW:
(I) A LICENSED PERSON MAY COMPOUND A DRUG OR DEVICE IN THE
STATE, INCLUDING THE COMPOUNDING OF A DRUG OR DEVICE IN A STERILE
OR NONSTERILE ENVIRONMENT;
(II) A STATE-LICENSED RESIDENT PHARMACY, LICENSED RESIDENT
503B OUTSOURCING FACILITY, STATE-LICENSED NONRESIDENT PHARMACY,
OR NONRESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING FACILITY MAY SUPPLY A
COMPOUNDED DRUG OR DEVICE TO A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER,
PHARMACY, FACILITY, OR ORGANIZATION; AND
(III) A LICENSED HEALTH-CARE PROVIDER, PHARMACY, FACILITY, OR
ORGANIZATION MAY OBTAIN, DISPENSE, OR ADMINISTER A COMPOUNDED
DRUG OR DEVICE SUPPLIED BY A STATE-LICENSED RESIDENT PHARMACY,
LICENSED RESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING FACILITY, STATE-LICENSED
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1262

NONRESIDENT PHARMACY, OR NONRESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING FACILITY.
(b) IN ADOPTING RULES TO IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION OR OTHERWISE
REGULATE THE COMPOUNDING OF DRUGS OR DEVICES BY LICENSED RESIDENT
503B OUTSOURCING FACILITIES OR NONRESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING
FACILITIES IN THE STATE, THE BOARD SHALL NOT ADOPT RULES THAT ARE
MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN APPLICABLE FEDERAL AND STATE LAW.
(c) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO CLASSIFY
LAWFUL COMPOUNDING PRACTICES AS MANUFACTURING OR TO EXPAND OR
ALTER THE BOARD'S ENFORCEMENT AUTHORITY AS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE
OF THIS SUBSECTION (1.5).
(d) THE FEDERAL LAW DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION INCLUDES THE
STANDARDS RECOGNIZED BY THE FDA FOR STATE-LICENSED RESIDENT
PHARMACIES, LICENSED RESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING FACILITIES,
STATE-LICENSED NONRESIDENT PHARMACIES, AND NONRESIDENT 503B
OUTSOURCING FACILITIES, INCLUDING INCORPORATED UNITED STATES
PHARMACOPEIA STERILE OR NONSTERILE PROCESSING STANDARDS.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-131, amend (2)
as follows:
12-280-131. New drugs - when sales permissible - exemptions.
(2) This section does not apply:
(a) To a drug THAT IS PLAINLY LABELED TO BE FOR INVESTIGATIONAL
USE ONLY AND THAT IS:
(I) Intended solely for investigational use by experts qualified by
scientific training and experience to investigate the safety and effectiveness
of drugs; if the drug is plainly labeled to be for investigational use only OR
(II) REVIEWED BY AN INSTITUTIONAL REVIEW BOARD;
(b) TO A COMPOUNDED DRUG OR DEVICE IF THE COMPOUNDING OF
THE DRUG OR DEVICE IS UNDERTAKEN IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE
FEDERAL AND STATE LAW, INCLUDING THE STANDARDS RECOGNIZED BY THE
FDA FOR STATE-LICENSED RESIDENT PHARMACIES, LICENSED RESIDENT
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1262

503B OUTSOURCING FACILITIES, STATE-LICENSED NONRESIDENT
PHARMACIES, AND NONRESIDENT 503B OUTSOURCING FACILITIES,
INCLUDING INCORPORATED UNITED STATES PHARMACOPEIA STERILE OR
NONSTERILE PROCESSING STANDARDS.
SECTION 5. Applicability. This act applies to conduct occurring
on or after the effective date of this act.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1262

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1262